Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Chapter 12 Guardian Ad Litem Program

Editor's notes. —

There is no article 2 in Chapter 12.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 76, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.